Washington statutes.
RCW 18.250.110

Medications.

(1) An athletic trainer licensed under this chapter:

(a) May purchase, store, and administer over-the-counter medications, as prescribed by an authorized health care practitioner for the practice of athletic training;

(b) Who has completed accredited training programs on pharmacology and medication administration may purchase, store, and administer medications in accordance with the programs, as prescribed by an authorized health care practitioner for the practice of athletic training.

(2) An athletic trainer may not administer any medications to a student in a public school as defined in RCW 28A.150.010 or private schools governed by chapter 28A.195 RCW.

(3) An athletic trainer may administer medications consistent with this section to a minor in a setting other than a school, if the minor's parent or guardian provides written consent.

(4) An athletic trainer licensed under this chapter who has completed an anaphylaxis training program in accordance with RCW 70.54.440 may administer an epinephrine autoinjector to any individual who the athletic trainer believes in good faith is experiencing anaphylaxis as authorized by RCW 70.54.440.

[ 2023 c 143 s 2; 2019 c 358 s 3.]